Wyoming, session 2025, SF0169.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-4-220.1 and 9-4-719(b)(intro) and
(q)(i) are amended to read:
9-4-220.1. Wyoming state penitentiary capital
construction account; funds transferred to the account.
(a) There is created the Wyoming state penitentiary
capital construction account. within the strategic
investments and projects account created by W.S. 9-4-220.
Funds in the account shall only be expended upon
legislative appropriation. Through the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2034, all funds within the account shall be
invested in the pool A investment account by the state
treasurer pursuant to W.S. 9-4-715(p). Thereafter, all
funds within the account shall be invested as determined by
the state treasurer. All investment earnings from the
account shall be credited to the account. For purposes of
accounting and investing only, the Wyoming state
penitentiary capital construction account shall be treated
as a separate account from the strategic investments and
projects account.
(b) Beginning on June 30, 2021 2027 for fiscal year
2021 2027 and June 30 of each fiscal year thereafter as
provided in this subsection, the state treasurer shall
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0169
ENROLLED ACT NO. 98, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
transfer ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00), or as much
thereof as is available, from any unobligated funds within
the strategic investments and projects account general fund
to the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction
account. The state treasurer shall cease transferring funds
to the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction
account pursuant to this subsection on July 1, 2038.
9-4-719. Investment earnings; spending policy
amounts; permanent funds.
(b) There is created the permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund reserve account. All funds within the account
shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized
under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d), (e) and (r) and all investment
earnings from the account shall be credited to the account.
Except for funds specified by the legislature that
guarantee the obligations of permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund investment earnings and funds to be transferred
into the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, funds
deposited into the reserve account created by this
subsection are intended to be inviolate and constitute a
permanent or perpetual trust fund. Beginning July 1, 2021
for fiscal year 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter, to
the extent funds are available, the state treasurer shall
transfer unobligated funds from this account to the general
fund on a quarterly, pro-rata basis as necessary to ensure
that an amount equal to two and one-half percent (2.5%) of
the previous five (5) year average market value of the
permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, calculated on the
first day of the fiscal year, is available for expenditure
during each fiscal year. As soon as possible after the end
of each of the fiscal years beginning on and after July 1,
2017, after making any transfer required pursuant to
paragraphs (i) and (ii) of by this subsection, revenues in
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0169
ENROLLED ACT NO. 98, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
this account in excess of two hundred forty-five percent
(245%) of the spending policy amount in subsection (d) of
this section shall be credited to the permanent Wyoming
mineral trust fund. For fiscal year 2020 2026 and for each
fiscal year thereafter:
(q) The earnings from the permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(iii) during each fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2016, which are less than the
spending policy established in subsection (d) of this
section are appropriated from the general fund subject to
subsection (s) of this section and the following:
(i) Any earnings in excess of two and one-half
percent (2.5%) of the previous five (5) year average market
value of the trust fund, calculated from the first day of
the fiscal year and less than or equal to the spending
policy amount specified in subsection (d) of this section
shall be credited to the legislative stabilization reserve
account; created by W.S. 9-4-219 and the strategic
investments and projects account created by W.S. 9-4-220 in
equal amounts;
Section 2. W.S. 9-4-220 and 9-4-719(b)(i) are
repealed.
Section 3. The strategic investments and projects
account is repealed.
Section 4. On July 1, 2026, all funds in the
strategic investments and projects account, except funds in
the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction account
within the strategic investments and project account, shall
be transferred by the state auditor to the general fund.
Any unexpended funds that have been appropriated or
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0169
ENROLLED ACT NO. 98, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
obligated from the strategic investments and projects
account before July 1, 2026 shall be paid from the general
fund. Any funds that are directed to revert by law to the
strategic investments and projects account shall revert to
the general fund. All accrued revenues that would otherwise
be deposited in the strategic investments and projects
account shall be deposited in the general fund.
Section 5. Not later than October 31, 2026 and again
not later than October 31, 2027, the state auditor shall
report to the joint appropriations committee on the amounts
transferred under section 4 of this act.
Section 6. On the effective date of this section, the
state auditor shall transfer ten million dollars
($10,000,000.00), or as much thereof as is available, from
the strategic investments and projects account to the
department of state parks and cultural resources for the
siting, construction, operation and maintenance of the
Wyoming state shooting complex. These funds shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose.
Section 7. On the effective date of this section, the
state auditor shall transfer nine million dollars
($9,000,000.00) from the Wyoming state penitentiary capital
construction account within the strategic investments and
project account to the department of corrections for
purposes of integrating the department's security system.
These funds shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose.
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0169
ENROLLED ACT NO. 98, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 8.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 6 through 8 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
5